Maine, session 132, LD1663.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §8720 is enacted to read:
§8720. Reporting of average amount paid by public payors
The organization shall report the average amount paid by public payors, including but
not limited to Medicare and the MaineCare program, on its publicly accessible website that
reports the average amount paid for common health care procedures at different health care
settings in the same manner that it reports the average amount paid by commercial payors.